Hawaii statutes.
PART I.
[OLD] UNIFORM ANATOMICAL GIFT ACT

§§327-1 to 9 REPEALED. L 1988, c 267, §2.

PART I.
[OLD] UNIFORM ANATOMICAL GIFT ACT

§§327-1 to 14 REPEALED. L 2008, c 122,
§4.

Note

L 2008, c 9, §3 purports to amend repealed §327-1.

[Part I.] REVISED UNIFORM ANATOMICAL
GIFT ACT

[§327-1] Short title. This part may be
cited as the "Revised Uniform Anatomical Gift Act". [L 2008, c 122,
pt of §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next